Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1701
Sections, purpose.

The purpose of sections 44-1701 to 44-1713 is to promote the public welfare by regulating credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance. Nothing in sections 44-1701 to 44-1713 is intended to prohibit or discourage reasonable competition. The provisions of sections 44-1701 to 44-1713 shall be liberally construed.

Laws 1959, c. 214, § 1, p. 737.